Alaska, session 34, HB151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 47.07.020(i) is amended to read: 05 (i) The department shall allow a person under six years of age who is 06 determined to be eligible for benefits under this chapter to remain eligible for 07 those benefits until the person is six years old. The department may allow a person 08 who is at least six years of age but not over [UNDER] 19 years of age and who is 09 determined to be eligible for benefits under this chapter to remain eligible for those 10 benefits for up to 11 calendar months following the month that the person is 11 determined eligible for benefits or until the person is 19 years old, whichever occurs 12 earlier. 13 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 14 read: 01 MEDICAID STATE PLAN; WAIVERS. The Department of Health shall, as 02 necessary for federal approval by the United States Department of Health and Human 03 Services, submit amendments to the state plan for medical assistance coverage or apply for 04 any waivers necessary to implement AS 47.07.020(i), as amended by sec. 1 of this Act. 05 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 06 read: 07 CONDITIONAL EFFECT; NOTIFICATION. (a) Section 1 of this Act takes effect 08 only if, on or before July 1, 2027, the United States Department of Health and Human 09 Services 10 (1) approves the waivers or amendments to the state plan for medical 11 assistance coverage submitted in accordance with sec. 2 of this Act; or 12 (2) determines that approval of the waivers and amendments to the state plan 13 for medical assistance coverage submitted in accordance with sec. 2 of this Act is not 14 necessary. 15 (b) The commissioner of health shall notify the revisor of statutes in writing within 30 16 days after the United States Department of Health and Human Services approves the waivers 17 or amendments to the state plan or determines that approval of the waivers and amendments is 18 not necessary under this section. 19 * Sec. 4. If sec. 1 of this Act takes effect, it takes effect on the day after the date the United 20 States Department of Health and Human Services approves the waivers or amendments to the 21 state plan or determines that approval of the waivers and amendments is not necessary. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.